Massachusetts, session 194th, S2666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 15ZZZZZZ the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
October 15th as Lobular Breast Cancer Awareness Day to promote awareness about the disease
and stimulate related research efforts and recommending that the day be observed in an
appropriate manner by the people.
of 1